Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-3438
Certificates; expiration; renewal; fees; continuing education.

Certificates of licensure and certificates of authorization shall expire on a date established by the board and shall become invalid after that date unless renewed. The board shall notify every person licensed under the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act and every organization holding a certificate of authorization under the act of the date of the expiration of the certificate of licensure or certificate of authorization and the amount of the fee required for renewal. The notice shall be provided at least one month in advance of the date of the expiration to the licensee or organization at the last-known address on file with the board. Valid certificates may be renewed prior to expiration upon application and payment of applicable fees. Expired certificates may be renewed in accordance with rules and regulations of the board. Renewal fees shall not exceed two hundred dollars per year. The board may require licensees to obtain continuing education as a condition of license renewal.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 38;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 38;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 42.
November 14, 2020